tr: Banjo deri tipi: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastik); Rönesans; Deri (doğal post); Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta membrane bendža: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastika); Renaissance; Koža (životinjska koža); Ostalo
pl: Typ membrany banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastik); Renaissance; Skóra naturalna; Inne
sv: Banjohuvudtyp: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plast); Renaissance; Skinn (naturlig hud); Övrigt
zh-TW: 斑鳩琴鼓皮類型: 纖維皮 (Fiberskyn); 聚酯薄膜 (塑膠); 復古皮 (Renaissance); 獸皮 (天然獸皮); 其他
fr: Type de peau de banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastique); Renaissance; Peau (peau naturelle); Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta glave banja: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastika); Renaissance; Koža (naravna); Drugo
bg-BG: Тип мембрана на банджото: Fiberskyn; Mylar (пластмаса); Renaissance; Естествена кожа; Друго
ko: 반조 헤드 유형: 파이버스킨; 마일라(플라스틱); 르네상스; 가죽(천연 가죽); 기타
cs: Typ blány na banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plast); Renaissance; Kůže (přírodní useň); Jiné
lt-LT: Banjos galvutės tipas: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastikas); Renaissance; Oda (natūrali); Kita
vi: Loại mặt đàn banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (nhựa); Renaissance; Da (da động vật tự nhiên); Khác
ro-RO: Tipul capului banjoului: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastic); Renaissance; Piele naturală; Altele
de: Typ des Banjofells: Fiberskyn; Mylar (Kunststoff); Renaissance; Fell (Naturfell); Sonstige
zh-CN: 班卓琴琴头类型: 仿皮 (Fiberskyn); 聚酯薄膜（塑料）; Renaissance; 兽皮（天然兽皮）; 其他
en: Banjo head type: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastic); Renaissance; Skin (natural hide); Other
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça de banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plástico); Renaissance; Pele (couro natural); Outro
hu: Bendzsófej típusa: Fiberskyn; Mylar (műanyag); Renaissance; Bőr (természetes nyersbőr); Egyéb
da: Banjotrommetype: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastik); Renaissance; Skind (naturligt skind); Andet
el: Τύπος μεμβράνης Banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (πλαστικό); Renaissance; Δέρμα (φυσικό); Άλλο
nl: Banjo veltype: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastic); Renaissance; Huid (natuurlijke dierenhuid); Overig
es: Tipo de parche de banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plástico); Renaissance; Piel (cuero natural); Otro
fi: Banjon kalvon tyyppi: Fiberskyn; Mylar (muovi); Renaissance; Nahka (luonnonvuota); Muu
nb: Banjo hodetype: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plast); Renaissance; Skinn (naturlig skinn); Annet
it: Tipo di pelle Banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plastica); Renaissance; Pelle (pelle naturale); Altro
th: ประเภทหัวแบนโจ: Fiberskyn; ไมลาร์ (พลาสติก); Renaissance; หนัง (หนังสัตว์แท้); อื่นๆ
ja: Banjoヘッドタイプ: ファイバースキン; マイラー (プラスチック); ルネサンス; スキン (天然皮革); その他
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça do banjo: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plástico); Renaissance; Pele (animal natural); Outro
sk-SK: Typ hlavy banja: Fiberskyn; Mylar (plast); Renaissance; Koža (prírodná koža); Iná
ru: Тип мембраны банджо: Fiberskyn; Майлар (пластик); Renaissance; Кожа (натуральная); Другое